Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
CHAPTER 39A Statewide Emergency Management Programs
39A.275.
COVID-19 claims — Immunity and filing limitations — Essential service providers. [Effective until December 31, 2023]

As used in this section:

“Arising from COVID-19” means an injury or harm that allegedly occurred on or after the emergency was declared on March 6, 2020, and until the emergency declaration is withdrawn, revoked, or lapses, caused by or resulting from:

The actual, alleged, or possible exposure to, transmission of, or contraction of COVID-19;

Services, treatment, or other action performed to limit or prevent the spread of COVID-19; or

Services performed by an entity outside the normal course of its business in response to COVID-19;

“COVID-19” means the novel coronavirus identified as SARS-CoV-2, or a virus mutating from SARS-CoV-2, or any variant of SARS-CoV-2, and medical conditions associated with the virus;

“COVID-19 claim” means any claim or cause of action for an act or omission arising from COVID-19 that accrued on or after the date the emergency was declared on March 6, 2020, and until the emergency declaration is withdrawn, revoked, or lapses;

“Executive action” means:

All orders and guidelines related to a COVID-19 declared emergency issued by the Governor or any state agency, the President of the United States or any federal agency, or a local governmental agency; and

Industry-specific guidelines related to a COVID-19 declared emergency adopted by a state agency that govern the industry;

“Executive action”:

Does not mean informal or indefinite statements or recommendations made by government officials; and

Does not create a duty of care;

“Health care providers” means:

Any health facility as defined in KRS

216B.015

;

Any person or entity providing health care or health services, including those licensed, certified, or registered under, or subject to, KRS

194A.700

to

194A.729

or KRS Chapters 310, 311, 311A, 311B, 312, 313, 314, 314A, 315, 319, 319A, 319B, 319C, 320, 327, 333, 334A, or 335;

The current and former employers, officers, directors, administrators, agents, or employees of those entities listed in subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this paragraph; or

Any person acting within the course and scope of his or her office, employment, or agency relating to a health care provider;

“Owner” means:

The possessor of a fee simple, reversionary, or easement interest, a tenant, lessee, occupant, or person in control of any premises, and his or her employees and agents; or

The possessor of an ownership interest, lessee, occupant, or person in control of an automobile, bus, train, boat, or aircraft, whether or not licensed as a common carrier or motor carrier, and his or her employees and agents;

“Person” has the same meaning as in KRS

446.010

, any other profit or nonprofit institution or legal entity, and any employer or employee;

“Political subdivision” has the same meaning as “governmental entity” in KRS

341.069

; and

“Premises” means:

Private or public roads, walking or cycling paths, sidewalks, hiking or multi-use trails, watercourses, or water ways;

Buildings and structures, including houses of worship, schools, homes, parks, restaurants, shops, stadiums, arenas, gyms, medical facilities, long-term care facilities, retail facilities, wholesale and manufacturing facilities, and facilities in which individuals charged with or convicted of a crime are incarcerated;

Aircraft, automobiles, trains, buses, or watercraft, whether or not licensed as a common carrier or motor carrier; or

Any other location where members of the public may engage in personal, commercial, social, religious, or other activities.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, an owner who follows any executive action to prevent the spread of COVID-19 during the COVID-19 declared emergency and either directly or indirectly invites or permits another person to enter the owner’s premises while a COVID-19 declared emergency affecting the premises remains in effect or continues, does not:

Extend any assurance that the premises are safe from any risk of exposure to COVID-19 or to conditions caused by the COVID-19 declared emergency;

Owe a duty to protect from or warn about any risk related to or caused by COVID-19; or

Assume responsibility, or incur liability, for any alleged injury, loss, or damage to persons or property arising from a COVID-19 claim.

Nothing in this section limits any liability of an owner for gross negligence, or wanton, willful, malicious, or intentional misconduct.

Nothing in this section shall:

Create a duty of care or ground of liability for injury to persons or property;

Relieve any person entering premises from any obligation that he or she may have in the absence of this section to exercise care in his or her use of the premises, or from the legal consequences of the failure to employ such care;

Affect the right of persons to receive benefits to which he or she would otherwise be entitled under KRS Chapter 342, nor does it affect the exclusive application of that chapter; or

Affect the applicability of KRS Chapter 338.

Any COVID-19 claim for personal injury against an owner or essential service provider shall be brought within the time set out in KRS

413.140

. For purposes of this subsection, such claim shall be deemed to have accrued at the time the injury is first discovered, or in the exercise of reasonable care should have been discovered.

Any COVID-19 claim involving motor vehicle accidents shall be governed by the limitation periods in KRS

304.39-230

.

Any COVID-19 claim involving damage to real property shall be brought within the time set out in KRS

413.120

.

Any essential service provider during the declared emergency of the COVID-19 pandemic shall not be liable for any COVID-19 claim.

Nothing in this subsection limits any liability of an essential service provider for gross negligence, or wanton, willful, malicious, or intentional misconduct.

The following businesses and service providers shall be deemed essential service providers and shall be considered an agent of the Commonwealth of Kentucky for the limited purpose of providing essential services arising from COVID-19:

The following service providers identified in Executive Order No. 2020-257 dated March 25, 2020:

Organizations that provide charitable and social services;

Individuals and businesses needed for transportation;

Financial institutions;

Mail, post, shipping, and pick-up services;

Individuals and businesses that produce, supply, prepare, and sell food;

Home-based care and services; and

Individuals and businesses that work in the supply chain for critical medical and pharmaceutical products;

Health care providers;

Medicaid waiver providers;

Elementary and secondary schools, whether public or private;

Child care service providers and facilities;

Funeral directors, morticians, undertakers, and embalmers;

Local government agencies and political subdivisions; and

Manufacturers located in the Commonwealth of Kentucky that produced or are producing, or that distributed or are distributing, medical, medicinal, hygienic items such as face masks and hand sanitizers, or other personal protective equipment.

Nothing in KRS Chapters 39A to 39F amends, repeals, or alters any immunity, defense, limitation of liability, or procedure available or required under any other law or contract.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 205, § 1, effective April 11, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/11/2021). 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 205, sec. 8 provides that KRS

39A.275

, as created in 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 205, sec. 1 shall be retroactive to March 6, 2020.

(4/11/2021). 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 205, sec. 10 provides, “Section 1 of this Act [KRS

39A.275

] is repealed effective December 31, 2023. Any causes of action that are prohibited or time-barred under this Act will remain so after its repeal.”

39A.280.
Nature of disaster and emergency response functions provided by state or local management agency, licensed professional engineer, or licensed architect — Immunity, exceptions.

Disaster and emergency response functions provided by a state or local emergency management agency, or any emergency management agency-supervised operating units or personnel officially affiliated with a local disaster and emergency services organization pursuant to KRS

39B.070

, shall not, in itself, be deemed to be the making of a promise, or the undertaking of a special duty, towards any person for the services, or any particular level of, or manner of providing, the services; nor shall the provision of or failure to provide these services be deemed to create a special relationship or duty towards any person upon which an action in negligence or other tort might be founded. Specifically:

The failure to respond to a disaster or other emergency, or to undertake particular inspections or types of inspections, or to maintain any particular level of personnel, equipment, or facilities, shall not be a breach of any duty to persons affected by any disaster or other emergency.

When a state or local emergency management agency, or local emergency management agency-supervised operating unit officially affiliated with a local disaster and emergency services organization, does undertake to respond to a disaster or other emergency, the failure to provide the same level or manner of service, or equivalent availability or allocation of resources as may or could be provided, shall not be a breach of any duty to persons affected by that disaster or other emergency.

A state or local emergency management agency, or local emergency management agency-supervised operating unit officially affiliated with a local disaster and emergency services organization shall not have or assume any duty towards any person to adopt, use, or avoid any particular strategy or tactic in responding to a disaster or other emergency.

A state or local emergency management agency, or local emergency management agency-supervised operating unit officially affiliated with a local disaster and emergency services organization, in undertaking disaster and emergency preparedness or prevention activities including inspections, or in undertaking to respond to a disaster or other emergency, shall not have voluntarily assumed any special duty with respect to any risks which were not created or caused by it, nor with respect to any risks which might have existed even in the absence of that activity or response, nor shall any person have a right to rely on such an assumption of duty.

Neither the state nor any political subdivision of the state, nor the agents or representatives of the state or any of its political subdivisions, shall be liable for personal injury or property damage sustained by any person appointed or acting as a volunteer emergency management agency member, or disaster and emergency services member, or disaster and emergency response worker, or member of any agency engaged in any emergency management or disaster and emergency services or disaster and emergency response activity. This immunity shall not affect the right of any person to receive benefits or compensation to which the person might otherwise be entitled under the Workers’ Compensation Law, or this chapter, or any pension law, or any Act of Congress.

Subject to subsection (6) of this section, neither the state nor any political subdivision of the state nor, except in cases of gross negligence or wanton, willful, malicious, or intentional misconduct, the employees, agents, or representatives of the state or any of its political divisions, nor any volunteer or auxiliary emergency management agency or disaster and emergency services organization member or disaster and emergency response worker or member of any agency engaged in any emergency management or disaster and emergency services or disaster and emergency response activity, complying with or reasonably attempting to comply with this chapter or any executive action or administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, or other measures enacted by any city or the state, shall be liable for the death of or injury to persons, or for damage to property, as a result of that activity.

Decisions of the director, his or her subordinates or employees, a local emergency management director, or the local director’s subordinates or employees, a rescue chief or the chief’s subordinates, concerning the allocation and assignment of personnel and equipment, and the strategies and tactics used, shall be the exercise of a discretionary, policy function for which neither the officer nor the state, county, urban-county, charter county, or city, or local emergency management agency-supervised operating unit formally affiliated with a local disaster and emergency services organization, shall be held liable in the absence of gross negligence or wanton, willful, malicious, or intentional misconduct, even when those decisions are made rapidly in response to the exigencies of an emergency.

Any person owning or controlling real estate or other premises who grants a license or privilege, or otherwise permits the designation or use of the whole or any part of the real estate or premises for the purpose of sheltering persons during an actual, impending, mock, or practice disaster or emergency, together with his or her successors in interest, shall not be civilly liable for negligently causing the death of, or injury to, any person on or about the real estate or premises for loss of, or damage to, the property of that person.

Subsection (3) of this section shall apply to a volunteer or auxiliary disaster and emergency response worker if the worker is enrolled or registered under KRS

39A.356

, or with the political subdivision in accordance with the political subdivision’s administrative regulations and as provided in KRS

39F.020

.

While engaged in disaster and emergency response activity, volunteers and auxiliary disaster and emergency response workers enrolled or registered with a local disaster and emergency service organization or with the division in accordance with subsection (6) of this section shall have the same degree of responsibility for their actions and enjoy the same immunities as officers and employees of the state and its political subdivisions performing similar work, including the provisions of KRS

12.211

,

12.212

, and

12.215

, allowing the Attorney General to provide defense of any civil action brought against a volunteer enrolled or registered due to an act or omission made in the scope and course of a disaster and emergency response activity.

A licensed professional engineer as defined in KRS

322.010

or an architect licensed under KRS Chapter 323, who provides architectural, structural, electrical, mechanical, or other professional services at the scene of a declared emergency, disaster, or catastrophe, shall not be liable for any personal injury, wrongful death, property damage, or other loss of any nature related to the licensed professional engineer’s or licensed architect’s acts, errors, or omissions in the performance of the services carried out:

At the request of or with the approval of a federal, state, or local:

Emergency management agency official with executive responsibility in the jurisdiction to coordinate disaster and emergency response activity;

Fire chief or his or her designee; or

Building inspection official;

whom the licensed professional engineer or licensed architect believes to be acting in an official capacity;

Within ninety (90) days following the end of the period for the declared emergency, disaster, or catastrophe. If the emergency is extended under KRS

39A.090

, the ninety (90) days shall run from the end date of the last extension; and

If the professional services arose out of the declared emergency, disaster, or catastrophe and if the licensed professional engineer or licensed architect acted as an ordinary reasonably prudent member of the profession would have acted under the same or similar circumstances.

Nothing in this subsection shall provide immunity for gross negligence or wanton, willful, or intentional misconduct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 488, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2014, ch. 129, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2021 ch. 6, § 5, effective February 2, 2021; 2021 ch. 205, § 6, effective April 11, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/11/21). This statute was amended by 2021 Ky. Acts. chs. 6 and 205, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Suits against the Commonwealth, Const., § 231.

39A.283.
Short title for KRS 39A.050, 39A.070, and 39A.285.

KRS

39A.050

,

39A.070

, and

39A.285

may be cited as the Antiterrorism Act of 2002.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 82, § 1, effective March 28, 2002; 2006, ch. 193, § 9, effective July 12, 2006.

39A.285.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly hereby finds that:

No government by itself can guarantee perfect security from acts of war or terrorism.

The security and well-being of the public depend not just on government, but rest in large measure upon individual citizens of the Commonwealth and their level of understanding, preparation, and vigilance.

The safety and security of the Commonwealth cannot be achieved apart from reliance upon Almighty God as set forth in the public speeches and proclamations of American Presidents, including Abraham Lincoln’s historic March 30, 1863, Presidential Proclamation urging Americans to pray and fast during one of the most dangerous hours in American history, and the text of President John F. Kennedy’s November 22, 1963, national security speech which concluded: “For as was written long ago: ‘Except the Lord keep the city, the watchman waketh but in vain.’”

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 82, § 2, effective March 28, 2002.

39A.287.
Preparedness of Commonwealth to respond to acts of war or terrorism — Annual assessment. [Repealed.]

39A.290.
Declared emergency — State executive orders, administrative regulations, or guidance in conflict with federal requirements or guidance on classification or treatment of certain utility, wastewater, water, sewer, and sanitation employees prohibited — Right of utility to terminate service or assess or collect fees and penalties not to be impaired.

During a declared emergency, no executive order, administrative regulation, or other guidance from a department or officer of state government shall be issued or promulgated that conflicts with any of the requirements or guidance, including advisory memoranda, that is issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security or its successor agencies regarding the classification or treatment of the employees of utilities subject to or created under KRS Chapter 58, 96, 278, or 279, regional wastewater commissions subject to or created under KRS Chapter 65, regional water commissions subject to or created under KRS Chapter 74, metropolitan sewer districts subject to or created under KRS Chapter 76, and sanitation districts subject to or created under KRS Chapter 220, as essential or critical infrastructure workers that are needed to ensure the continuity of functions critical to public health and safety or economic and national security.

Beginning on June 29, 2021, during a declared emergency, no current or future executive order, administrative regulation, or other guidance shall remain in effect or be issued or promulgated by a department or officer of state government that prohibits or otherwise impairs the right of a utility subject to or created under KRS Chapter 96 from:

Terminating service for a customer’s non-payment of a utility bill; or

Assessing or collecting its usual and customary fees or penalties for non-payment or delinquent payments of a customer’s utility bill.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 158, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

39A.295.
Taking of property or rights guaranteed by KRS 237.102 or 237.104 not authorized — Rights of relocated persons unaffected.

Nothing in KRS

39A.100

,

39A.110

,

39A.120

,

39A.130

, or

39A.140

, or any other provision of this chapter, shall authorize a taking of property or the taking of any action which is in violation of KRS

237.102

or

237.104

.

If a person is relocated to temporary housing before, during, or after a disaster or emergency, he or she shall still possess the rights guaranteed by KRS

237.102

and

237.104

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 240, § 9, effective July 12, 2006.

39A.300.
Disaster Relief Funding Program.

The Disaster Relief Funding Program is established and shall be administered by the Division of Emergency Management in accordance with the provisions of this section.

A Disaster Relief Funding Program trust fund is established as a separate revolving fund. The trust fund shall be administered by the Division of Emergency Management and the proceeds shall be used to support the Disaster Relief Funding Program.

The Disaster Relief Funding Program trust fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, and any other funds both public and private.
(3) (a) 1. The Disaster Relief Funding Program trust fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, and any other funds both public and private.

The Disaster Relief Funding Program trust fund shall not publicly advertise for or solicit contributions from the general public that could potentially impact fundraising efforts of not-for-profit disaster relief agencies.

Trust fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

Any interest earnings of the trust fund shall become a part of the trust fund and shall not lapse.

Any funds deposited in the trust fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth in this section.

Eligibility for funds under the Disaster Relief Funding Program shall be limited to cities, counties, urban-counties, charter counties, and consolidated local governments of the Commonwealth and individuals who have disaster-related needs that cannot or will not be met by other relief agencies and who are residents of, and living in, the Commonwealth on the date of the emergency.

Eligible applicants located in an area where there has been a declared emergency by the Governor, as defined in KRS

39A.020

, may receive financial assistance when federal authorities decline to issue a federal declaration of disaster and federal assistance will not be forthcoming.

Cities, counties, urban-counties, charter counties, and consolidated local governments of the Commonwealth that are eligible applicants may receive financial assistance to pay the state contribution required by the federal government in cases where there has been a federal declaration of disaster.

The Division of Emergency Management shall promulgate administrative regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 56, § 1, effective June 20, 2005.

39A.305.
West Kentucky State Aid Funding for Emergencies (SAFE) fund.

The West Kentucky State Aid Funding for Emergencies (SAFE) fund is established and shall be:

Administered by the Department of Military Affairs, Division of Emergency Management, in accordance with this section;

A separate fund to provide financial assistance for those impacted by the December 2021 storms and tornadoes that occurred in the west Kentucky region; and

Used to provide financial support to the west Kentucky region to recover from the devastation caused by the storms and tornadoes.

The Department of Military Affairs or the Division of Emergency Management shall not publicly advertise or solicit contributions from the general public that could potentially impact fundraising efforts of not-for-profit disaster relief agencies.

The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, and any other funds, both public and private.

Moneys in the fund as of June 30, 2022, and June 30, 2023, shall not lapse and shall carry forward until June 30, 2024.

Any interest earnings of the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall not lapse.

Eligibility to receive financial support from the fund shall be limited to a:

City, county, urban-county government, consolidated local government, unified local government, or charter county government;

Nonprofit or public utility service provider;

State agency;

School district; or

Qualified lender as defined in KRS

154.20-580

;

that has disaster-related needs as a result of the devastation experienced from the December 2021 storms and tornadoes.

An eligible recipient may receive moneys for expenses to provide disaster and recovery relief if the recipient:

Is located in the areas named in a Presidential Declaration of Emergency relating to the storms and tornadoes that occurred in December 2021; and

Has disaster-related needs in response to the storms and tornadoes that occurred in December 2021.

Eligible expenses shall be those used to support disaster and recovery relief, including but not limited to:

Replacement or renovation of public buildings damaged by the storms and tornadoes, but only to the extent of damage directly caused by the storms;

Reimbursement for services, personnel, and equipment provided during the response and recovery to communities impacted by the storms and tornadoes;

Funding to cities, counties, and publicly owned utilities for the costs of replacement or repair of publicly owned buildings and their contents due to the damage from the storms and tornadoes, but only to the extent of damage directly caused by the storms;

Assistance to cities and counties for expenses related to planning efforts for rebuilding and recovering from the damage, but only to the extent of damage directly caused by the storms;

Assistance to support disaster recovery and relief needs of local school districts, including but not limited to:

Financial support for school districts that will experience a default in bond payments; and

Financial support to assist school districts with building and tangible property replacement needs; and

Contracted employees to administer and report on the funds.

Each recipient of moneys from the fund, including any agency of Kentucky state government, shall:

Timely apply for federal emergency disaster grant assistance, other financial disaster assistance, and insurance proceeds; and

Adhere to the terms of the fund regarding reimbursement to the Commonwealth if funds from other sources are subsequently received after the receipt of financial assistance from the state.

Moneys in the fund may be used for the advancement of moneys to cities, counties, and nonprofit or public utility service providers experiencing strained fiscal liquidity while awaiting reimbursement from federal emergency management assistance or insurance claims and shall not be used for capital improvements.

Reimbursement of the advancement under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall:

Be determined by the Department for Local Government’s state-local finance officer; and

Include a quarterly accounting of the advancement released and the outstanding balance through June 30, 2024.

If a recipient of moneys from the fund subsequently receives moneys from any other source, the recipient shall reimburse the Commonwealth for the amount of the moneys received from the fund.

Before July 1, 2024, all moneys reimbursed to the Commonwealth under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be deposited in the West Kentucky State Aid Funding for Emergencies (SAFE) fund within thirty (30) days, and shall be continuously appropriated.

After June 30, 2024, all moneys reimbursed to the Commonwealth under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be deposited into the general fund within thirty days.

The Division of Emergency Management shall promulgate administrative regulations to carry out this section.

The following reports shall be submitted to the Senate Standing Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and the House Standing Committee on Appropriations and Revenue or the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by the tenth day of each month, beginning May 10, 2022, and ending July 10, 2024:

A report from the Office of State Budget Director that includes:

The name of each recipient of moneys from the fund;

The dollar amount of moneys received;

A description of how the moneys were used; and

A list of all requests:

(a)

Submitted, including the amount requested;

Denied, including a description of the reason for the denial; and

Where the amount awarded was greater than or less than the amount requested, including a description of the reason for the increase or decrease; and

(b)

A report from the Department of Education that includes:

The name of each school district receiving moneys from the fund;

The dollar amount of moneys received;

A description of how the moneys were used; and

A list of all requests:

(a)

Submitted, including the amount requested;

(b)

Denied, including a description of the reason for the denial; and

(c)

Where the amount awarded was greater than or less than the amount requested, including a description of the reason for the increase or decrease.

A report shall be submitted to the Senate Standing Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and the House Standing Committee on Appropriations and Revenue or the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by the tenth day following the end of each calendar quarter by the Cabinet for Economic Development, beginning July 10, 2024, and ending when no further applications for a loss payment may be submitted under KRS

154.20-589

(7), including:

The name of each qualified lender receiving a loss payment;

The dollar amount of the payment received;

A description of the loan terms; and

An explanation regarding why the loss payment was needed.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 2, § 4, effective January 13, 2022; enacted by 2022 ch. 222, § 2, effective April 15, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/15/2022). This statute was created by House Bill 5, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 2, which was subsequently amended by Senate Bill 150, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 222. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 222, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.